Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 66-1801 to 66-1868 shall be known and
may be cited as the State Natural Gas Regulation Act.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB658, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 9.